Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202619-1201
Revitalize Rural Nebraska Grant Program; Department of Water, Energy, and Environment; award grants; application; priority; appropriation; legislative intent.

(1) There is hereby established the Revitalize Rural Nebraska Grant Program. The governing body of a city of the first class, a city of the second class, or a village may apply, on behalf of the city or village, to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment for approval of a demolition grant for substandard and abandoned commercial property. The Director of Water, Energy, and Environment shall prescribe the form and manner of application.

(2) The department shall award the grants annually on a competitive basis beginning in fiscal year 2023-24 subject to available funds. The department shall give priority to applications from cities of the second class and villages. If there are funds remaining at the end of each grant period, the department shall consider applications from cities of the first class. A city or village may apply for more than one grant. The department shall give preference to new applicants.

(3) There shall be no limit on the amount that can be awarded to each applicant within the available funding. It is the intent of the Legislature that if the department does not award all of the available appropriation for grants under the program, the unobligated amount of the appropriation shall be reappropriated for the next fiscal year to be awarded during the next grant period.

Laws 2023, LB531, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 40;

Laws 2026, LB883, § 4.
July 18, 2026